Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7617.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-21-22 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-21 entitled "Health and
Safety of Pupils" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-21-22. Allergic emergencies — Anaphylaxis — Use of epinephrine — Immunity
for those administering.
(a) The department of elementary and secondary education and the department of health
shall incorporate into their policies, rules, and regulations pertaining to school health programs a
procedure for addressing incidents of anaphylaxis (exaggerated allergic reaction) in order to
provide for the health and safety of children who have been medically identified as being prone to
anaphylaxis or who show evidence of anaphylaxis. The policies, rules, and regulations shall include
a procedure whereby a parent or legal guardian of any child may expressly authorize the school
department and school bus drivers and monitors to administer the epinephrine on his or her child
in case of an emergency and ensures that the epinephrine is kept in a conspicuous place, readily
available, and that their proper use is made known to school personnel. School bus drivers and
monitors shall receive training in the administration of epinephrine. To treat a case of anaphylaxis,
trained school bus drivers and/or monitors shall administer the epinephrine auto-injector delivery
devices approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, or epinephrine nasal spray,
as applicable, to an identified student.
(b) The policies, rules, and regulations shall also include a procedure to allow children to
carry and use prescription inhalers, and auto-injectable epinephrine, while in school, at a school-

sanctioned function or event, or in transit to and from school or school-sanctioned function or event
by the school bus service provider; when prescribed by a licensed individual with prescriptive
privileges. Children who need to carry prescription inhalers and/or auto-injectable epinephrine shall
provide the school and the school bus service provider with medical documentation that the inhaler
and/or auto-injectable epinephrine has been legitimately prescribed and that the child needs to carry
it on his or her person due to a medical condition, but no child shall be disciplined solely for failure
to provide this documentation in advance.
(c) Parents shall provide a doctor’s letter or prescription notifying the school and the school
bus service provider of their child’s allergy and the need to administer epinephrine in an allergic
emergency.
(d) No school teacher, school administrator, or school healthcare personnel, school bus
driver, school bus monitor, or any other school personnel shall be liable for civil damages which
may result from acts or omissions in use of the epinephrine which may constitute ordinary
negligence; nor shall the school personnel mentioned in this subsection be liable for civil damages
which may result from acts or omissions in the use of prescription inhalers by children which may
constitute ordinary negligence. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting
gross negligence or willful or wanton conduct. For the purposes of determining immunity from
liability under subsection (d) only, the term “other school personnel” shall include any private entity
providing school bus services and individual school bus drivers and monitors employed or
otherwise engaged by such school bus service entities.
(e) School physicians may execute standing orders and prescriptions for school nurses to
use epinephrine when there are symptoms of anaphylaxis. The school department may permit each
school within their jurisdiction to maintain epinephrine in cartridge injections for the purpose of
emergency first aid to students who experience allergic reactions. The department’s policies, rules,
and regulations shall also include the conditions and procedures for the storage and administration
of epinephrine for the purpose of emergency first aid to students who experience allergic reactions.
(f) The student’s parent or guardian is responsible for supplying and replacing, when
necessary, all prescription medication that is authorized pursuant to this section.
(g) The administration, use, or maintenance of epinephrine provided for under the
provisions of this section shall be deemed to include epinephrine delivery devices approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration, cartridges, and nasal sprays.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004770/SUB A
========
LC004770/SUB A - Page 2 of 3